Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-418
Legislative Fiscal Office; established; Legislative Fiscal Analyst; personnel; Appropriations Committee; duty.

(1) There shall be established within the Legislative Council the Legislative Fiscal Office. The Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be responsible for hiring, firing, and supervising the fiscal office staff.

(2) The Appropriations Committee shall determine the budgeting and related needs of each agency of state government before and during each session of the Legislature.

Laws 1961, c. 253, § 1, p. 746;

Laws 1967, c. 595, § 2, p. 2026;

Laws 1986, LB 996, § 3;

Laws 1992, LB 898, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 80.